lt-LT: Muselinės meškerės stilius: Bambukinis; „Euro Nymph“; Stiklo pluošto; Sūriam vandeniui; Vienarankis; „Spey“; Strimeriams; „Switch“; Upėtakių „Spey“; Jaunimui; Kita
sl-SI: Slog muharske palice: Bambus; Euro Nymph; Steklo; Za morsko vodo; Enoročna; Spey; Streamer; Switch; Trout Spey; Za mlade; Drugo
it: Stile canna da mosca: In bambù; Euro Nymphing; In fibra di vetro; Da mare; A una mano; Spey; Streamer; Switch; Trout Spey; Per giovani; Altro
vi: Kiểu cần câu: Tre; Euro Nymph; Sợi thủy tinh; Nước mặn; Một tay; Spey; Streamer; Switch; Trout Spey; Trẻ em; Khác
fr: Style de canne à mouche: Bambou; Nymphe européenne; Fibre de verre; Eau de mer; À une main; Spey; Streamer; Switch; Spey truite; Jeune; Autre
pt-PT: estilo de cana de pesca com mosca: Bambu; Euro nymph; Fibra de vidro; Água salgada; Uma mão; Spey; Streamer; Switch; Trout Spey; Jovem; Outro
de: Stil der Fliegenrute: Bambus; Euro Nymph; Glas; Salzwasser; Einhand; Spey; Streamer; Switch; Trout Spey; Jugend; Sonstiges
pt-BR: Estilo da vara de pesca com mosca: Bambu; Euro Nymph; Fibra de vidro; Água salgada; Mão única; Spey; Streamer; Switch; Trout Spey; Juvenil; Outro
tr: Sinek kamışı tipi: Bambu; Euro Nemf; Cam; Tuzlu su; Tek el; Spey; Streamer; Switch; Alabalık Spey; Genç; Diğer
fi: Perhovavan tyyppi: Bambu; Euro-nymfi; Lasi; Suolavesi; Yksikätinen; Spey; Streamer; Switch; Trout Spey; Nuoriso; Muu
bg-BG: Стил на въдица за мухарка: Бамбукова; Евро нимфа; Фибростъкло; Морски риболов; За една ръка; Спей; Стример; Суич; Пъстървов спей; Детска; Друга
el: Στυλ καλαμιού για τεχνητή μύγα: Μπαμπού; Euro Nymph; Fiberglass; Αλμυρού νερού; Ενός χεριού; Spey; Streamer; Switch; Trout Spey; Εφηβικό; Άλλο
hu: Horgászbot stílus: Bambusz; Euro Nymph; Üveg; Tengeri; Egykezes; Spey; Streamer; Switch; Trout Spey; Ifjúsági; Egyéb
en: Fly rod style: Bamboo; Euro Nymph; Glass; Saltwater; Single-hand; Spey; Streamer; Switch; Trout Spey; Youth; Other
nl: Vliegenhengel stijl: Bamboe; Euro Nymph; Glas; Zoutwater; Eenhandig; Spey; Streamer; Switch; Trout Spey; Jeugd; Overige
sk-SK: Typ muškárskeho prúta: Bambusová; Euro nymfa; Sklolaminátová; Do slanej vody; Jednoručná; Spey; Streamer; Switch; Pstruhová spey; Mládežnícka; Iné
ru: Стиль нахлыстового удилища: Бамбуковое; Евро-нимфа (Euro Nymph); Стекловолоконное; Морское; Одноручное; Спей (Spey); Для стримеров; Свитч (Switch); Спей для форели (Trout Spey); Детское/подростковое; Другое
hr-HR: Stil štapa za mušičarenje: Bambus; Euro nimfa; Staklo; Za morsku vodu; Jednoručni; Spey; Streamer; Switch; Spey za pastrve; Za djecu; Ostalo
da: Type af fluestang: Bambus; Euro Nymph; Glasfiber; Saltvand; Enhånds; Spey; Streamer; Switch; Trout Spey; Junior; Andet
es: Estilo de caña de pesca con mosca: Bambú; Ninfa europea; Fibra de vidrio; Agua salada; Una mano; Spey; Streamer; Switch; Spey para trucha; Juvenil; Otro
sv: Typ av flugspö: Bambu; Euro nymphing; Glasfiber; Saltvatten; Enhands; Spey; Streamer; Switch; Trout spey; Ungdom; Övrigt
nb: Fluestangstil: Bambus; Euro-nymfe; Glassfiber; Saltvann; Enhånds; Spey; Streamer; Switch; Ørret Spey; Ungdom; Annet
zh-TW: 飛蠅釣竿樣式: 竹製; 歐式若蟲毛鉤竿; 玻璃纖維; 海水飛蠅竿; 單手竿; 斯佩竿 (Spey); 飾帶毛鉤竿; 雙手替換竿 (Switch); 鱒魚斯佩竿; 青少年; 其他
cs: Styl muškařského prutu: Bambusový; Euro Nymph; Sklolaminátový; Mořský; Jednoruční; Spey; Streamer; Switch; Pstruhový Spey; Dětský; Ostatní
ro-RO: Stilul lansetei de muscă: Bambus; Euro Nymph; Fibră de sticlă; Apă sărată; Pentru o mână; Spey; Streamer; Switch; Trout Spey; Tineret; Altele
th: สไตล์คันเบ็ดฟลาย: ไม้ไผ่; ยูโรนิมฟ์; ไฟเบอร์กลาส; น้ำเค็ม; มือเดียว; สเปย์; สตรีมเมอร์; สวิตช์; เทราต์สเปย์; เด็ก; อื่นๆ
ja: フライロッドスタイル: バンブー; ユーロニンフ; グラス; ソルトウォーター; シングルハンド; スペイ; ストリーマー; スイッチ; トラウトスペイ; ユース; その他
zh-CN: 飞钓竿样式: 竹竿; 欧式若虫钓竿 (Euro Nymph); 玻璃钢; 咸水竿; 单手竿; 斯佩竿 (Spey); 飘带蝇竿; 切换竿 (Switch); 鳟鱼斯佩竿 (Trout Spey); 青少年用竿; 其他
pl: Styl wędki muchowej: Bambusowa; Euro Nymph; Z włókna szklanego; Morska; Jednoręczna; Spey; Streamer; Switch; Trout Spey; Dla młodzieży; Inna
ko: 플라이 낚싯대 스타일: 뱀부; 유러피언 님프; 글라스; 바다용; 싱글 핸드; 스페이; 스트리머; 스위치; 트라우트 스페이; 유소년용; 기타